Delaware, session 153, HB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Title 31 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3903. Eligibility for childcare subsidies (a) A family is eligible for childcare subsidies under the Purchase of Care program if the familyâs gross income does not exceed 200% of the following percentages of the Federal Poverty Level (FPL), adjusted annually: (1) For the period beginning October 1, 2026 through June 30, 2027, 225% of the FPL; (2) For the period beginning October 1, 2027 through June 30, 2029, 250% of the FPL; (3) For the period beginning October 1, 2029 through June 30, 2031, 275% of the FPL. (b) Families exceeding the entry threshold at redetermination may continue subsidies up to the following for 12 months, with copayment capped at 7% of income: (1) For the period beginning October 1, 2026 through June 30, 2027, 325% of the FPL; (2) For the period beginning October 1, 2027 through June 30, 2029, 350% of the FPL; (3) For the period beginning October 1, 2029 through June 30, 2031, 375% of the FPL. (c) The Department of Health and Social Services shall administer this section and report annually on enrollment, costs, and demographics by FPL brackets. Section 2. Sunset Clause. The amendments made by Section 1 of this Act shall expire on June 30, 2032, unless extended by further act of the General Assembly. Upon expiration, eligibility shall revert to 200% of the FPL, subject to any subsequent legislation. Section 3. This Act takes effect upon enactment, with eligibility changes effective October 1, 2026.